Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 626.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 626.2. There are hereby created state tuition aid
grants which shall be maintained by the state, awarded and
administered pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Higher
Education Tuition Aid Act, and used by the holders thereof for study
in nonprofit, accredited institutions of higher education in
Oklahoma this state or in nonprofit, accredited institutions
participating in a state authorization reciprocity agreement
pursuant to Section 4103 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2006 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
March 3, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2006 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)